Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB106.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1 to 4 of this Act:
(1) "Ambulance service" means:
(a) A Kentucky-based ambulance provider licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter
311A;
(b) An ambulance service operating under KRS Chapter 75;
(c) An emergency ambulance service district established under KRS 108.080 to
108.180;
(d) Any ambulance service established by a local government, operating under
KRS Chapter 75A; or
(e) A private ambulance service that is under contract with a local government,
a KRS Chapter 75 fire district, or a KRS Chapter 75A emergency services
district to provide the primary ambulance transport services;
(2) "EMS professional" means any employee licensed as an EMT, AEMT,
paramedic, or advanced practice paramedic of an ambulance service;
(3) "Established work schedule":
(a) Means a work schedule adopted by or required of an ambulance service
setting a recurring pattern for time on and off duty for an EMS professional
employed by the ambulance service; and
(b) Includes but is not limited to a schedule of twenty-four (24) consecutive
hours of duty followed by forty-eight (48) hours off duty;
(4) "Fund" means the EMS Professionals Foundation Program fund created in
Section 2 of this Act;
(5) "Local government" means any city, county, urban-county government, charter
Page 1 of 17
XXXX 11/4/2025 9:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 158
county government, unified local government, consolidated local government, air
board created under KRS Chapter 183, an ambulance service district, or any
combination thereof in the Commonwealth;
(6) "Scheduled overtime" means work by an EMS professional in excess of forty (40)
hours per week which regularly recurs as part of an established work schedule;
and
(7) "Unscheduled overtime" means work by an EMS professional in excess of forty
(40) hours per week which does not regularly recur as part of an established work
schedule.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency account to be
known as the EMS Professionals Foundation Program fund. The fund shall
consist of appropriations from the general fund of the Commonwealth of
Kentucky, insurance premium surcharge proceeds, and earnings on the
investments of those moneys which accrue to the fund under Sections 5 and 7 of
this Act. The fund may also receive any other funds, gifts, or grants made
available to the state for distribution to ambulance services.
(2) The fund shall be administered by the board.
(3) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for the purposes provided in Sections
1 to 4, 5, and 7 of this Act.
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be
carried forward into the next fiscal year.
(5) Funds made available to the board shall be received, held, and expended in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter and administrative regulations
promulgated by the board.
(6) (a) 1. An EMS professional who is diagnosed by a psychiatrist, psychologist,
Page 2 of 17
XXXX 11/4/2025 9:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 158
or professional counselor credentialed under KRS 335.500 to 335.599
with a post-traumatic stress injury or post-traumatic stress disorder, as
defined in the most recent edition of the American Psychiatric
Association's Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders,
caused by an event or an accumulation of events that occurred in the
course and scope of employment as an EMS professional shall be
eligible for reimbursement from the fund for his or her out-of-pocket
costs for mental health treatment, regardless of an initial physical
injury.
2. Notwithstanding subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, a post-traumatic
stress injury, as defined in the most recent edition of the American
Psychiatric Association's Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental
Disorders, that arises solely from a legitimate personnel action such as
transfer, promotion, demotion, or termination shall not be considered
a compensable injury that qualifies an EMS professional for
reimbursement benefits under this subsection.
(b) If an EMS professional seeks mental health treatment for a post-traumatic
stress injury or post-traumatic stress disorder:
1. After in-network health insurance has been utilized, he or she may
submit corresponding receipts for medical bills paid by the EMS
professional to the board for reimbursement from the fund to the EMS
professional for out-of-pocket costs incurred, to the extent that funds
are available and allocated in the board's budget for EMS
professional mental health treatment;
2. He or she shall pay his or her out-of-pocket costs for the mental health
treatment before submitting receipts for reimbursement; and
3. He or she shall submit receipts evidencing payment of out-of-pocket
Page 3 of 17
XXXX 11/4/2025 9:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 158
costs within twelve (12) months of the payment date to be eligible for
reimbursement under this subsection.
(7) Each ambulance service shall be eligible to share in the distribution of the fund if
the ambulance service:
(a) Operates or contracts with an ambulance service that provides basic life
support or advanced life support services when responding to emergency
911 service calls;
(b) Employs two (2) or more full-time EMS professionals;
(c) Pays every EMS professional not less than the minimum federal wage;
(d) Requires all employed EMS professionals to successfully complete, in each
calendar year, an in-service training program of one hundred (100) hours
or a lesser duration as established by the board. The requirement shall be
waived while an EMS professional is serving on active duty in the United
States Armed Forces; and
(e) Maintains compliance with all provisions of law applicable to EMS
professionals.
(8) Each EMS professional shall be eligible to share in the distribution of the fund if
he or she:
(a) Is employed as an EMS professional by an ambulance service, which meets
the requirements in subsection (7) of this section, as a full-time employee,
and is regularly involved in patient care;
(b) Obtains the minimum educational requirement of a high school diploma or
its equivalent, as determined by the board;
(c) If employed as an EMS professional on or after the effective date of this
Act, successfully completes a training course sufficient for licensure as an
EMT, AEMT, paramedic, or advanced practice paramedic, as set by the
board;
Page 4 of 17
XXXX 11/4/2025 9:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 158
(d) Successfully completes, in each calendar year, an in-service training
program of one hundred (100) hours or a lesser duration as established by
the board. The requirement shall be waived while an EMS professional is
serving on active duty in the United States Armed Forces; and
(e) Maintains compliance with all provisions of law applicable to EMS
professionals.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board shall administer the fund pursuant to Sections 1 to 4 of this Act, and
may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
to facilitate the administration of the fund.
(2) The board shall determine which ambulance services are eligible to share in the
fund and may withhold or terminate payments to any ambulance service that does
not comply with the requirements set forth in Sections 1 to 4 of this Act.
(3) The board shall, from the moneys appropriated to and accruing to the fund from
any source, provide staffing for administering these funds, including but not
limited to the expenses and costs of board operations. Annual administration
costs shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the total amount of moneys accruing to
the fund which are allotted for the purposes specified in this section during any
fiscal year.
(4) Upon receipt of the written request by the Finance and Administration Cabinet
for cost projections of the EMS Professionals Foundation Program fund as
described in Section 5 of this Act, the board shall certify, in writing, within
twenty-one (21) calendar days the projections to the Finance and Administration
Cabinet.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 5 of 17
XXXX 11/4/2025 9:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 158
(1) An eligible ambulance service shall be entitled to receive an annual supplement
of four thousand eight hundred dollars ($4,800) for each qualified, full-time
EMS professional it employs, plus an amount equal to the required employer's
contribution on the supplement to the defined benefit pension plan, or to a plan
qualified under 26 U.S.C. sec. 401(a) or 457.
(2) Qualified EMS professionals receiving a supplement from the Firefighters
Foundation Program fund under KRS 95A.200 to 95A.300 or the Law
Enforcement Foundation Program fund under KRS 15.410 to 15.510 shall not be
eligible to participate in the EMS Professionals Foundation Program fund.
(3) The amount of the employer's contribution to any retirement plan calculated
from the supplement shall not exceed the amount of the required employer's
contribution to the County Employees Retirement System pursuant to KRS
Chapter 78 for the hazardous duty category. The pension contribution on the
supplement shall be paid whether the EMS professional entered the system under
hazardous duty coverage or nonhazardous coverage.
(4) The ambulance service shall pay the amount received for retirement coverage to
the appropriate retirement system to cover the required employer contribution on
the supplement.
(5) If program funds are insufficient to pay employer contributions to the system,
then the total amount available for pension payments shall be prorated to each
eligible ambulance service so that each receives the same percentage of required
pension costs attributable to the supplement.
(6) The eligible EMS professional shall receive the distribution of the supplement
from the ambulance service in twelve (12) monthly installments with his or her
pay for the last pay period of each month. The monthly distribution shall be
calculated by dividing the supplement amount established in this section by twelve
(12).
Page 6 of 17
XXXX 11/4/2025 9:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 158
(7) The supplement disbursed to a qualified EMS professional pursuant to Sections 1
to 4 of this Act shall not be considered wages as defined in KRS 337.010 and shall
not be included in the hourly wage rate for calculation of overtime pursuant to
KRS 337.285 for scheduled overtime. The supplement shall be included in the
hourly wage rates for calculation of overtime for unscheduled overtime pursuant
to KRS 337.285.
(8) To determine the addition to the hourly wage rate for calculation of overtime on
unscheduled overtime, the annual supplement shall be divided by two thousand
eighty (2,080). The overtime rate for unscheduled overtime shall be calculated by
adding the quotient, which is the amount of the annual supplement divided by
two thousand eighty (2,080), to the hourly wage rate and multiplying the total by
one and one-half (1.5). The enhanced overtime rate shall be paid only for
unscheduled overtime. Scheduled overtime shall be paid at one and one-half (1.5)
times the regular hourly wage rate, excluding the supplement.
Section 5. KRS 42.190 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [On June 1, 1982, and then ]On or before the first day of each December, March,
June, and September[ thereafter], the cabinet shall request in writing of the
administrator of the Firefighters Foundation Program fund[,] which is established
by KRS 95A.220, the administrator of the EMS Professionals Foundation
Program fund which is established by Section 2 of this Act, and of the
administrator of the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund[,] which is
established by KRS 15.430, cost projections of their respective funds for the next
quarter. Based on these projections, the cabinet shall determine the proportionate
share of total insurance premium surcharge proceeds, prescribed in KRS 136.392,
to accrue to each fund.
(2) On or before the first day of each quarter, the cabinet shall certify to the State
Treasurer a distribution schedule describing the proportionate share of total
Page 7 of 17
XXXX 11/4/2025 9:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 158
insurance premium surcharge proceeds accruing to each fund during such quarter,
and the State Treasurer shall pay into each fund's trust and agency account its
proportionate share of all deposited tax moneys as set forth and in the manner as
prescribed in KRS 136.392.
(3) Moneys deposited in the Firefighters Foundation Program fund's trust and agency
account, the EMS Professionals Foundation Program fund's trust and agency
account, and in the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund's trust and agency
account, shall be invested by the state in accordance with state investment practices,
and all earnings from the[such] investments shall accrue to, and be paid into the
respective account from which such investments are made.[ All moneys remaining
on deposit at the close of the state's fiscal year in the Firefighters Foundation
Program fund's trust and agency account and all earnings from investments made
from moneys in this account in excess of three million dollars ($3,000,000),
beginning with fiscal year 1994-95, through June 30, 1999, shall lapse, except that
moneys in the revolving loan fund established in KRS 95A.262 shall not lapse. All
moneys remaining on deposit at the close of the state's fiscal year in the Law
Enforcement Foundation Program fund's trust and agency account, and all earnings
from investments made from moneys in this account, in excess of three million
dollars ($3,000,000), beginning with fiscal year 1994-95, through June 30, 1999,
shall lapse. On and after July 1, 1999,] Moneys in these accounts shall not lapse.
(4) The cabinet shall provide monthly financial reports to the administrator of the
Firefighters Foundation Program fund, the administrator of the EMS Professionals
Foundation Program fund, and the administrator of the Law Enforcement
Foundation Program fund respecting the amount of funds received and on deposit in
each fund and the amount of earnings accruing to each fund from their investment.
Section 6. KRS 61.315 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
Page 8 of 17
XXXX 11/4/2025 9:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 158
(a) "Police officer" means every paid police officer, sheriff, or deputy sheriff,
corrections employee with the power of a peace officer pursuant to KRS
196.037, any metropolitan or urban-county correctional officer with the power
of a peace officer pursuant to KRS 446.010, any jailer or deputy jailer, any
auxiliary police officer appointed pursuant to KRS 95.445, any police officer
of a public institution of postsecondary education appointed pursuant to KRS
164.950, any school resource officer as defined in KRS 158.441, or any
citation or safety officer appointed pursuant to KRS 83A.087 and 83A.088,
elected to office, or employed by any county, airport board created pursuant to
KRS Chapter 183, city, local board of education, or by the state;
(b) "Firefighter" means every paid firefighter or volunteer firefighter who is
employed by or volunteers his or her services to the state, airport board
created pursuant to KRS Chapter 183, any county, city, fire district, or any
other organized fire department recognized, pursuant to KRS 95A.262, as a
fire department operated and maintained on a nonprofit basis in the interest of
the health and safety of the inhabitants of the Commonwealth and shall
include qualified civilian firefighters employed at Kentucky-based military
installations; and
(c) "Emergency medical services personnel" means any paid or volunteer
emergency medical services personnel who is certified or licensed pursuant to
KRS Chapter 311A and who is employed directly by, or volunteering directly
for, any:
1. County;
2. City;
3. Fire protection district created under KRS 75.010 to 75.260;[ or]
4. Emergency ambulance service district created under KRS 108.080 to
108.180;
Page 9 of 17
XXXX 11/4/2025 9:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 158
5. Ambulance service as defined in Section 1 of this Act; or
6. Air ambulance service while performing in an official capacity with
an ambulance service as defined in Section 1 of this Act;
to provide emergency medical services.
(2) The spouse of any police officer, sheriff, deputy sheriff, corrections employee with
the power of a peace officer pursuant to KRS 196.037, any metropolitan or urban-
county correctional officer with the power of a peace officer pursuant to KRS
446.010, any jailer or deputy jailer, any auxiliary police officer appointed pursuant
to KRS 95.445, any police officer of a public institution of postsecondary education
appointed pursuant to KRS 164.950, any school resource officer as defined in KRS
158.441, or any citation or safety officer appointed pursuant to KRS 83A.087 and
83A.088, firefighter, or member of the Kentucky National Guard on state active
duty pursuant to KRS 38.030, or a member of a state National Guard or a Reserve
component on federal active duty under Title 10 or 32 of the United States Code
who names Kentucky as home of record for military purposes, whose death occurs
on or after July 1, 2002, as a direct result of an act in the line of duty shall receive a
lump-sum payment of eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) if there are no surviving
children, which sum shall be paid by the State Treasurer from the general fund of
the State Treasury. The spouse of any emergency medical services personnel whose
death occurs on or after November 1, 2015, as a direct result of an act in the line of
duty shall receive a lump-sum payment of eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) if there
are no surviving children, which sum shall be paid by the State Treasurer from the
general fund of the State Treasury. If there are surviving children and a surviving
spouse, the payment shall be apportioned equally among the surviving children and
the spouse. If there is no surviving spouse, the payment shall be made to the
surviving children, eighteen (18) or more years of age. For surviving children less
than eighteen (18) years of age, the State Treasurer shall:
Page 10 of 17
XXXX 11/4/2025 9:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 158
(a) Pay thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) to the surviving children; and
(b) Hold forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000) in trust divided into equal accounts
at appropriate interest rates for each surviving child until the child reaches the
age of eighteen (18) years.
If a child dies before reaching the age of eighteen (18) years, his or her account
shall be paid to his or her estate. If there are no surviving children, the payment
shall be made to any parents of the deceased.
(3) The Kentucky Fire Commission shall be authorized to promulgate administrative
regulations establishing criteria and procedures applicable to the administration of
this section as it pertains to both paid and volunteer firefighters, including but not
limited to defining when a firefighter has died in line of duty. Administrative
hearings promulgated by administrative regulation under authority of this
subsection shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(4) The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations
establishing criteria and procedures applicable to the administration of this section
as it pertains to police officers, any metropolitan or urban-county correctional
officers with the power of a peace officer pursuant to KRS 446.010, any school
resource officer as defined in KRS 158.441, or any jailers or deputy jailers,
including but not limited to defining when one has died in line of duty.
Administrative hearings promulgated by administrative regulation under authority
of this subsection shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(5) The Department of Corrections shall promulgate administrative regulations
establishing the criteria and procedures applicable to the administration of this
section as it pertains to correctional employees, including but not limited to
defining which employees qualify for coverage and which circumstances constitute
death in the line of duty.
(6) The Kentucky Board of Emergency Medical Services shall promulgate
Page 11 of 17
XXXX 11/4/2025 9:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 158
administrative regulations establishing the criteria and procedures applicable to the
administration of this section as it pertains to emergency medical services
personnel, including but not limited to which employees or volunteers qualify for
coverage and which circumstances constitute death in the line of duty.
(7) The Department of Military Affairs shall promulgate administrative regulations
establishing the criteria and procedures applicable to the administration of this
section as it pertains to National Guard or Reserve component members, including
but not limited to defining which National Guard or Reserve component members
qualify for coverage and which circumstances constitute death in the line of duty.
(8) The estate of anyone whose spouse or surviving children would be eligible for
benefits under subsection (2) of this section, and the estate of any regular member
of the United States Armed Forces who names Kentucky as home of record for
military purposes whose death occurs as a direct result of an act in the line of duty,
shall be exempt from all probate fees, including but not limited to those established
by the Supreme Court of Kentucky pursuant to KRS 23A.200 and 24A.170, or
imposed under KRS 24A.185, 64.012, and 172.180.
(9) The benefits payable under this section shall be in addition to any benefits now or
hereafter prescribed under any police, sheriff, firefighter's, volunteer firefighter's,
emergency medical services personnel, or National Guard or Reserve retirement or
benefit fund established by the federal government or by any state, county, or any
municipality.
(10) Any funds appropriated for the purpose of paying the death benefits described in
subsection (2) of this section shall be allotted to a self-insuring account. These
funds shall not be used for the purpose of purchasing insurance.
(11) (a) For the purposes of this section, if a firefighter dies as a result of cancer, the
death shall be a direct result of an act in the line of duty if the firefighter:
1. Was a firefighter for at least five (5) consecutive years;
Page 12 of 17
XXXX 11/4/2025 9:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 158
2. Developed one (1) or more of the cancers listed in paragraph (b) of this
subsection which caused the firefighter's death within ten (10) years of
separation from service as a firefighter;
3. Did not use tobacco products for a period of ten (10) years prior to the
diagnosis of cancer;
4. Was under the age of sixty-five (65) at the time of death;
5. Was not diagnosed with any cancer prior to employment as a firefighter;
and
6. Was exposed while in the course of firefighting to a known carcinogen
as defined by the International Agency for Research on Cancer or the
National Toxicology Program, and the carcinogen is reasonably
associated with one (1) or more of the cancers listed in paragraph (b) of
this subsection.
(b) This section shall apply to the following cancers:
1. Bladder cancer;
2. Brain cancer;
3. Colon cancer;
4. Non-Hodgkin's lymphoma;
5. Kidney cancer;
6. Liver cancer;
7. Lymphatic or haematopoietic cancer;
8. Prostate cancer;
9. Testicular cancer;
10. Skin cancer;
11. Cervical cancer; and
12. Breast cancer.
(c) 1. The provisions of this subsection creating an entitlement to the line of
Page 13 of 17
XXXX 11/4/2025 9:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 158
duty death benefits shall apply exclusively to this section and shall not
be interpreted or otherwise construed to create either an express or
implied presumption of work-relatedness for any type of claim filed
pursuant to KRS Chapter 342.
2. This paragraph is intended to provide clarification regarding the sole and
exclusive application of this subsection to only the benefits available
under this section and shall not be used as a bar or other type of
limitation to impair or alter the rights and ability of a claimant to prove
work-relatedness under KRS Chapter 342 or other laws.
Section 7. KRS 136.392 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Every domestic, foreign, or alien insurer, other than life and health insurers,
which is either subject to or exempted from Kentucky premium taxes as
levied pursuant to the provisions of either KRS 136.340, 136.350, 136.370, or
136.390, shall charge and collect a surcharge of one dollar and eighty cents
($1.80) upon each one hundred dollars ($100) of premium, assessments, or
other charges, except for those municipal premium taxes, made by it for
insurance coverage provided to its policyholders, on risk located in this state,
whether the charges are designated as premiums, assessments, or otherwise.
The premium surcharge shall be collected by the insurer from its
policyholders at the same time and in the same manner that its premium or
other charge for the insurance coverage is collected. The premium surcharge
shall be disclosed to policyholders pursuant to administrative regulations
promulgated by the commissioner of insurance. However, no insurer or its
agent shall be entitled to any portion of any premium surcharge as a fee or
commission for its collection. On or before the twentieth day of each month,
each insurer shall report and remit to the Department of Revenue, on forms as
it may require, all premium surcharge moneys collected by it during its
Page 14 of 17
XXXX 11/4/2025 9:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 158
preceding monthly accounting period less any moneys returned to
policyholders as applicable to the unearned portion of the premium on
policies terminated by either the insured or the insurer. Insurers with an
annual liability of less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each of the
previous two (2) calendar years may report and remit to the Department of
Revenue all premium surcharge moneys collected on a calendar year basis on
or before the twentieth day of January of the following calendar year. The
funds derived from the premium surcharge shall be deposited in the State
Treasury, and shall constitute a fund allocated for the uses and purposes of the
Firefighters Foundation Program fund, KRS 95A.220 and 95A.262, the EMS
Professionals Foundation Program fund, Section 2 of this Act, and the Law
Enforcement Foundation Program fund, KRS 15.430.
(b) Effective July 1, 2019, the surcharge rate in paragraph (a) of this subsection
shall only be adjusted by an Act of the General Assembly, and the adjusted
rate shall be applied beginning ninety (90) days after the effective date of the
Act.
(2) Within five (5) days after the end of each month, all insurance premium surcharge
proceeds deposited in the State Treasury as set forth in this section shall be paid by
the State Treasurer into the Firefighters Foundation Program fund trust and agency
account, the EMS Professionals Foundation Program fund trust and agency
account, and the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund trust and agency
account. The amount paid into each account shall be proportionate to each fund's
respective share of the total deposits, pursuant to KRS 42.190. [Moneys deposited
to the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund trust and agency account shall
not be disbursed, expended, encumbered, or transferred by any state official for
uses and purposes other than those prescribed by KRS 15.410 to 15.500, except that
beginning with fiscal year 1994-95, through June 30, 1999, moneys remaining in
Page 15 of 17
XXXX 11/4/2025 9:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 158
the account at the end of the fiscal year in excess of three million dollars
($3,000,000) shall lapse. On and after July 1, 1999, moneys in this account shall not
lapse. Money deposited to the Firefighters Foundation Program fund trust and
agency account shall not be disbursed, expended, encumbered, or transferred by any
state official for uses and purposes other than those prescribed by KRS 95A.200 to
95A.300, except that beginning with fiscal year 1994-95, through June 30, 1999,
moneys remaining in the account at the end of the fiscal year in excess of three
million dollars ($3,000,000) shall lapse, but moneys in the revolving loan fund
established in KRS 95A.262 shall not lapse. On and after July 1, 1999, ]Moneys in
this account shall not lapse.
(3) Insurance premium surcharge funds collected from the policyholders of any
domestic mutual company, cooperative, or assessment fire insurance company shall
be deposited in the State Treasury, and shall be paid monthly by the State Treasurer
into the Firefighters Foundation Program fund trust and agency account as provided
in KRS 95A.220 to 95A.262. However, insurance premium surcharge funds
collected from policyholders of any mutual company, cooperative, or assessment
fire insurance company which transfers its corporate domicile to this state from
another state after July 15, 1994, shall continue to be paid into the Firefighters
Foundation Program fund, the EMS Professionals Foundation Program fund, and
the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund as prescribed.
(4) No later than July 1 of each year, the Department of Insurance shall provide the
Department of Revenue with a list of all Kentucky-licensed property and casualty
insurers and the amount of premium volume collected by the insurer for the
preceding calendar year as set forth on the annual statement of the insurer. No later
than September 1 of each year, the Department of Revenue shall calculate an
estimate of the premium surcharge due from each insurer subject to the insurance
premium surcharge imposed pursuant to this section, based upon the surcharge rate
Page 16 of 17
XXXX 11/4/2025 9:19 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 158
imposed pursuant to this section and the amount of the premium volume for each
insurer as reported by the Department of Insurance. The Department of Revenue
shall compare the results of this estimate with the premium surcharge paid by each
insurer during the preceding year and shall provide the Legislative Research
Commission, the Kentucky Fire Commission, the Kentucky Board of Emergency
Medical Services, the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, and the Department of
Insurance with a report detailing its findings on a cumulative basis. In accordance
with KRS 131.190, the Department of Revenue shall not identify or divulge the
confidential tax information of any individual insurer in this report.
(5) The insurance premiums surcharge provided in this section shall not apply to
premiums collected from the following:
(a) The federal government;
(b) Resident educational and charitable institutions qualifying under Section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(c) Resident nonprofit religious institutions for real, tangible, and intangible
property coverage only;
(d) State government for coverage of real property; or
(e) Local governments for coverage of real property.
(6) Pursuant to the Non-Admitted and Reinsurance Reform Act of 2010, Title V,
Subtitle B, of the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act,
Pub. L. No. 111-203, the insurance premium surcharge on non-admitted insurance
for multistate risks shall be exempt from the provisions of this section but shall be
subject to the provisions of KRS 304.10-180.
Page 17 of 17
XXXX 11/4/2025 9:19 AM Jacketed